Tennessee, session 114, HB0088.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-3-359(a), is amended by deleting
"two hundred dollars ($200)" and substituting "five hundred dollars ($500)".
SECTION 2. This act is not an appropriation of funds, and funds shall not be obligated
or expended pursuant to this act unless the funds are specifically appropriated by the General
Appropriations Act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0088
000738
- 1 -